District of Columbia statutes.
31-2103

Judicial review.

Any order or decision of the Mayor shall be subject to review in accordance with § 2-510, at the request of any person suffering a legal wrong or whose interests are adversely affected or aggrieved by the order or decision of the Mayor.

Oct. 21, 1993, D.C. Law 10-43, § 4, 40 DCR 6023

History

Hospital and medical services corporation, applicability of this section, see § 31-3503.

Cross References

1981 Ed., § 35-3503.

Prior Codifications